Hawaii statutes.
§514C-4 Compliance with procedures not
required when. Nothing in this part shall prohibit any lessor and
association of condominium owners or cooperative housing corporation from
agreeing to the sale and purchase of the leased fee interest or any part thereof.
[L 1988, c 298, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 241, §3(4)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next